Maryland, session 2026, HB1252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall:
(1) study housing availability and affordability in Montgomery County;
and
(2) make recommendations to increase housing availability and
affordability in Montgomery County.
(b) In conducting the study and making the recommendations required under this
section, the Department shall:
(1) identify the makeup of available housing in the county by unit type;
(2) identify any development prospects in the county; and
(3) determine the impact of regulations and market forces on Montgomery
County’s housing supply.
(c) The Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Department shall submit to
the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission, the Montgomery County
Planning Department, the Montgomery County Executive, the Montgomery County
Council, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Montgomery County Delegation to the General Assembly:
(1) interim findings and recommendations under this section on or before:
(i) November 30, 2026 February 1, 2027; and
– 1 –

Ch. 582 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) November 30, 2027 February 1, 2028; and
(2) a final report of its findings and recommendations under this section on
or before November 30, 2028 February 1, 2029.
(d) (1) The Department shall confer with the Montgomery County Department
of Housing and Community Affairs, Department of Permitting Services, and Planning
Department regarding data collection and analysis.
(2) Before issuing each of the reports required under subsection (c) of this
section, the Department shall provide each of the entities listed in paragraph (1) of this
subsection with an opportunity to provide a written response to its findings and
recommendations and include any written response as an appendix to the report.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain in effect for a period of 3 years and, and the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –